Utah statutes.
78B-6-142.   Adoption order from foreign country.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided by federal law, an adoption order rendered
to a resident of this state that is made by a foreign country shall be
recognized by the courts of this state and enforced as if the order were
rendered by a court in this state.
(2)  A person who adopts a child in a foreign country may register the order
in this state.  A petition for registration of a foreign adoption order may be
combined with a petition for a name change.  If the court finds that the
foreign adoption order meets the requirements of Subsection (1), the court
shall order the state registrar to:
(a)  file the order pursuant to Section 78B-6-137; and
(b)  file a certificate of birth for the child pursuant to Section 26-2-28.
(3)  If a clerk of the court is unable to establish the fact, time, and place
of birth from the documentation provided, a person holding a direct, tangible,
and legitimate interest as described in Subsection 26-2-22(2)(a) or (b) may
petition for a court order establishing the fact, time, and place of a birth
pursuant to Subsection 26-2-15(1).
